
−DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI−233

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC C1225 /25 toC 1228 /28 TRC&VSCSolenoidCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The TRC & VSC solenoid operates in accordance with signals from the ECU and raises the fluid pressure
in and releases it from the brake cylinders.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1225 /25
Openorshort circuit forSA 1 circuit continues for0.0 15sec.
or more.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA1 circuit

C1226 /26
Openorshort circuit forSA2circuit continues for0.0 15sec.
or more.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA2circuit

C1227 /27
Openorshort circuit forSA3circuit continues for0.0 15sec.
or more.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA3circuit

C1228 /28
Openorshort circuit forSTRcircuit continues for0.0 15
sec. or more.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSTRcircuit
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check TRC & VSC solenoid.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the 2 connectors from hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:
Check continuity between terminals A48 − 4 and A50 − 5, 6, 11
and 12 of hydraulic brake booster.
OK:

Continuity
HINT:
Resistance of each solenoid at 20 ˚ C (68 ˚ F)
SA1, SA2, STR: 4.05 − 4.55 �
SA3: 6.95 − 7.45 �

NG Replace hydraulic brake booster.

OK

2 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between skid control
ECU and hydraulic brake booster (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.


